Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 4. Garnishment

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

6 Am. Jur. 2d Attachment and Garnishment § 1 et seq.

Garnishee's duty to give debtor notice of garnishment prior to delivery of money without judgment against the garnishee on the debt, 36 ALR4th 824.

38 C.J.S. Garnishment § 1 et seq.

§ 1-15-401.
Availability of writ of garnishment.

Subject to W.S.

1-15-101

through

1-15-108

, a plaintiff or judgment creditor may obtain a writ of garnishment as provided in this article.

A prejudgment writ of garnishment is available as a means of attachment of tangible or intangible property, other than earnings from personal services of the defendant, at any time after the filing of a complaint and before judgment, in cases in which a writ of attachment is available under W.S.

1-15-201

.

A post judgment writ of garnishment is available to satisfy a money judgment.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001; Laws 1901, ch. 95, § 1; C.S. 1910, §§ 4794, 4856 to 4860; C.S. 1920, §§ 6064, 6126 to 6130; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-4801, 3-5010 to 3-5014; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239, 1-430; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114,

1-17-501

; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3; 1988, ch. 42, § 1.

Support garnishments have priority. —

Support garnishments have priority and where they result in the withholding of 25 percent or more of an employee's disposable earnings, creditor garnishments are impermissible. Union Pac. R.R. v. Trona Valley Fed. Credit Union, 2002 WY 165, 57 P.3d 1203,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Understanding the Tort of Third-Party Bad Faith in Wyoming: Western Casualty & Surety Company v. Fowler Revisited,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 635 (1991).

§ 1-15-402.
Property subject to garnishment.

Any writ of garnishment
may be used to levy upon or affect the accrued credits, chattels,
goods, effects, debts, choses in action, money and other personal
property and rights to property of the defendant in the possession
of a third person, or under the control or constituting a performance
obligation of any third person, whether due or yet to become due at
the time of service of the writ of garnishment, which are not exempt
from garnishment or execution under any applicable provisions of state
or federal law.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Garnishment of funds payable under building and construction contract, 16 ALR5th 548.

Joint bank account as subject to attachment, garnishment, or execution by creditor of one joint depositor, 86 ALR5th 527.

§ 1-15-403.
Affidavit for writ of prejudgment garnishment.

Before a writ of prejudgment garnishment is issued, the plaintiff shall file with the court in which the action is pending an affidavit stating:

The facts showing that plaintiff’s claim is one upon which attachment is authorized by W.S.

1-15-201

;

The grounds and cause for the garnishment;

That the plaintiff has good reason to believe that the defendant has nonexempt credits, chattels, goods, effects, debts, choses in action or other personal property or rights to obligations of performance in the possession or in the control or otherwise owing from one (1) or more specified third persons that plaintiff seeks to charge as garnishees or that such third persons are indebted to the defendant; and

That the property, rights or debts are not earnings for the personal services of the defendant, or otherwise exempt from garnishment.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 1-15-404.
Issuance of writ of prejudgment garnishment.

If authorized by a written
order of the court pursuant to W.S. 1-15-103(a)(i), the clerk shall issue one (1) or more writs of prejudgment
garnishment upon the filing by the plaintiff of the bond required
by W.S.

1-15-104

.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

§ 1-15-405.
Issuance of writ of post judgment garnishment; multiple writs.

After the entry of a judgment requiring the payment of money, the clerk of the court from which execution could issue shall, upon application of the plaintiff, issue one (1) or more writs of post judgment garnishment. The writ may be issued without the necessity for a bond.

Several writs may be issued at the same time and the names of as many persons as are sought to be charged as garnishees may be inserted in the same writ or different writs.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 87; Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 475, 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2823, 2878 to 2882, 3508; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3943, 3997 to 4001, 4420; Laws 1901, ch. 95, § 1; C.S. 1910, §§ 4794, 4802, 4856 to 4860, 5283; C.S. 1920, §§ 6064, 6072, 6126 to 6130, 6555; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1305, 89-3109, 89-3117, 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-4705, 3-4801, 3-5010 to 3-5014, 14-905; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239, 1-414, 1-430, 1-645; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114,

1-17-405

,

1-17-501

,

1-21-505

; Laws 1985, ch. 144, § 2; 1986, ch. 62, § 1; 1987, ch. 198, § 3; 1988, ch. 42, § 1.

§ 1-15-406.
Content of writ of prejudgment or post judgment garnishment; to whom
directed.

A writ of prejudgment
or post judgment garnishment shall be issued in the name of the state
of Wyoming and shall be directed to the person or persons designated
in the plaintiff’s affidavit as garnishee. The writ shall advise each
person that until further order of the court or until the garnishee
has complied with the requirements of W.S. 1-15-407(c), he is attached as garnishee in the action, command him
not to pay any debt due or to become due to the defendant which is
not exempt from execution and to retain possession and control of
all credits, chattels, goods, effects, debts, choses in action, money
and personal property and rights to property of the defendant not
exempt from execution.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 130; Laws 1882, ch. 59, § 1; 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882, 3546; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001, 4457; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860, 5320; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130, 6592; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1606, 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014, 14-1406; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239, 1-576; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3; 1993, ch. 110, § 1.

Cited

in

Zaloudek v. Zaloudek, 2010 WY 169, 245 P.3d 336,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Dec. 21, 2010).

§ 1-15-407.
Answer of garnishee; release of garnishee.

A writ of prejudgment or post judgment garnishment shall require the garnishee to file with the court a verified answer within ten (10) days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, from the date of service of the writ. The answer of the garnishee shall state:

Whether the garnishee is indebted to the defendant, either in property or in money, whether the same is now due and, if not, when it is to become due;

Whether the garnishee has in his possession, custody or control any credits, chattels, goods, effects, debts, choses in action, money or other personal property belonging to the defendant, or in which the defendant has an interest, and if so, the description and value of the same;

Whether the garnishee knows of any debts owing to the defendant or of any credits, chattels, goods, effects, debts, choses in action, money or other personal property belonging to the defendant or in which defendant has an interest, whether in the possession or under the control of the garnishee or another, and if so, the particulars thereof;

If the defendant is an employee of the garnishee, the defendant’s job title, position or occupation, the defendant’s rate and method of compensation, his pay period and the computation of the amount of the defendant’s accrued disposable earnings attached by the writ;

Whether the garnishee, pursuant to W.S.

1-15-417

, is retaining or deducting any amount in satisfaction of a claim the garnishee has against the plaintiff or the defendant, a designation as to whom the claim relates and the amount retained or deducted.

The garnishee shall mail a copy of his answer to the plaintiff and defendant if, at the time he is served with the writ, the garnishee is furnished with stamped envelopes addressed to the parties.

The garnishee shall be released from the writ of garnishment not later than thirty (30) days after service of the writ on the garnishee, unless sooner released by order of the court, provided, that the garnishee has first filed with the court the verified answer required by subsection (a) of this section and delivered to the court all of the defendant’s credits, chattels, goods, effects, debts, choses in action, money, personal property and rights to property not exempt from execution, in the possession of the garnishee or coming into his possession within thirty (30) days after service of the writ.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, §§ 87, 132; Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 475, 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2823, 2878 to 2882, 3508, 3548; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3943, 3997 to 4001, 4420, 4459; Laws 1901, ch. 95, § 1; C.S. 1910, §§ 4794, 4802, 4856 to 4860, 5283, 5322; C.S. 1920, §§ 6064, 6072, 6126 to 6130, 6555, 6594; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1305, 62-1608, 89-3109, 89-3117, 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-4705, 3-4801, 3-5010 to 3-5014, 14-905, 14-1408; Laws 1957, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239, 1-414, 1-430, 1-578, 1-645; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114,

1-17-405

,

1-17-501

, 1-21-308,

1-21-505

; Laws 1985, ch. 184, § 2; 1986, ch. 62, § 1; 1987, ch. 198, § 3; 1988, ch. 42, § 1; 1993, ch. 110, § 1.

§ 1-15-408.
Garnishment of earnings for personal services.

A writ of post judgment garnishment attaching earnings for personal services shall attach that portion of the defendant’s accrued and unpaid disposable earnings, specified in subsection (b) of this section. The writ shall direct the garnishee to withhold from the defendant’s accrued disposable earnings the amount attached pursuant to the writ and to pay the exempted amount to the defendant at the time his earnings are normally paid. A defendant’s disposable earnings shall remain exempt to the extent provided in subsection (b) of this section if the earnings were deposited in the defendant’s account with a financial institution within twenty (20) calendar days prior to service of a writ of garnishment against the defendant’s account with the financial institution, on the day of service of the writ or within ten (10) business days after service of the writ. This subsection does not create any obligation on the part of a financial institution to conduct an investigation of the defendant’s account or otherwise make any determination about a judgment creditor’s rights to funds in the account other than the financial institution’s obligation to file with the court and serve on the defendant an answer to the writ of garnishment. A judgment creditor may request that the court issue writs of garnishment to a defendant’s employer and the defendant’s financial institution at the same time; provided, however, that should the judgment creditor successfully garnish earnings as shown on a defendant’s pay advice, then the remaining proceeds from such pay advice deposited into an account with a financial institution shall be entirely exempt from execution, notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section. Earnings for personal services shall be deemed to accrue on the last day of the period in which they were earned or to which they relate. If the writ is served before or on the date the defendant’s earnings accrue and before the same have been paid to the defendant, the writ shall be deemed to have been served at the time the periodic earnings accrue. If more than one (1) writ is served, the writ first served shall have priority. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, an income withholding order for child support obtained pursuant to W.S.

20-6-201

through

20-6-222

shall have priority over any other garnishment.

The maximum portion of the aggregate disposable earnings of an individual which are subject to garnishment is the lesser of:

Twenty-five percent (25%) of defendant’s disposable earnings for that week; or

The amount by which defendant’s aggregate disposable earnings computed for that week exceeds thirty (30) times the federal minimum hourly wage prescribed by the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, 29 U.S.C. 206(a)(1), in effect at the time the earnings are payable, or, in case of earnings for any pay period other than a week, any equivalent multiple thereof prescribed by the administrator of the Wyoming Uniform Consumer Credit Code in the manner provided by W.S. 40-14-505(b)(iii).

Unless a garnishee is specifically informed by affidavit of the plaintiff that the defendant has other periodic earnings from sources other than from the garnishee and the amount thereof, the garnishee shall treat the defendant’s earnings becoming due from the garnishee as the defendant’s entire aggregate earnings for the purpose of computing the sum attached by the garnishment.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 483, 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2831, 2878 to 2882; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; 1897, ch. 11, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3951, 3997 to 4001; Laws 1903, ch. 31, § 1; C.S. 1910, §§ 4810, 4856 to 4860; C.S. 1920, §§ 6080, 6126 to 6130; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3125, 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-4713, 3-5010 to 3-5014; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239, 1-422; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114,

1-17-411

; Laws 1985, ch. 194, § 2; 1986, ch. 62, § 1; 1987, ch. 198, § 3; 2019 ch. 70, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), added the third, fourth, and fifth sentences.

Editor's note. —

Laws 2019, ch. 70 § 2, provides: "This act shall apply only to writs of garnishment issued on or after the effective date of this act."

Income from growing wheat
on farm fell within earnings exemption provisions of §

1-17-411

,

prior to the 1987 amendment thereof.
Lingle State Bank v. Podolak, 740 P.2d 392,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 480

(Wyo. 1987).

Rancher or farmer cannot claim as exempt

75% of the proceeds derived from the sale of nonpurchase money livestock. Coones v. FDIC, 796 P.2d 803,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1990).

A rancher or farmer cannot claim as exempt 75% of the value of the crops and livestock offspring planted or born after the perfection of a security interest. Coones v. FDIC, 796 P.2d 803,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1990).

Where ranching operations were the judgment debtor's sole source of income and the funds in his bank account which were garnished represented proceeds from the sale of his cattle, the statutory exemption for earnings for personal services did not apply as the funds were not traceable to a third-party obligation payable periodically within the meaning of § 1-15-102(a)(vi). McManaman v. McManaman, 2002 WY 128, 53 P.3d 103,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2002).

Income tax refunds. —

Debtor's income tax refund, which included earned income credit, did not constitute “earnings” or “disposable earnings” exempt from garnishment. Trudeau v. Royal (In re Trudeau), 237 B.R. 803, 1999 Bankr. LEXIS 1075 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. 1999).

Unpaid wages or other earnings. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 1-15-408(a) and 40-14-505(a)(ii) deal with unpaid wages or other earnings; they do not deal with wages or other earnings that have made their way into a debtor's bank account, and the law clearly limits the exception to “accrued and unpaid” earnings. Royal v. Walsh (In re Walsh), 2004 WY 96, 96 P.3d 1,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2004).

Executory waiver of earnings exemption is not permissible as matter of public policy,

and a security agreement which purports to deny a debtor and his family a statutory earnings exemption is precisely the type of executory arrangement that is objectionable and contrary to public policy. Lingle State Bank v. Podolak, 740 P.2d 392,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 480

(Wyo. 1987) (decided under §

1-17-411

prior to 1987 amendment).

Exemption of joint account funds requires accounting. —

When the evidence demonstrates that expenses paid from the joint account are to be shared by the depositors, the depositors' burden of establishing the exemption of any portion of the funds from execution clearly demands more than simply proving the deposits. Some accounting in the form of tracing the deposited funds and disbursements must be established. Hancock v. Stockmens Bank & Trust Co., 739 P.2d 760,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 468

(Wyo. 1987).

Support garnishments have priority. —

Support garnishments have priority and where they result in the withholding of 25 percent or more of an employee's disposable earnings, creditor garnishment is impermissible. Union Pac. R.R. v. Trona Valley Fed. Credit Union, 2002 WY 165, 57 P.3d 1203,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

S & S Diversified Servs. v. Taylor, 897 F. Supp. 549, 1995 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12664 (D. Wyo. 1995); In re Welty, 217 B.R. 907, 1998 Bankr. LEXIS 92 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Enforcement of claim for alimony or support, or for attorneys' fees and costs incurred in connection therewith, against exemptions, 52 ALR5th 221.

§ 1-15-409.
Service
of writ; return; copy to defendant.

A writ of prejudgment or post judgment garnishment shall be served on the garnishee in the same manner as a summons.

Not later than five (5) days after service is made upon the garnishee the sheriff or other person who served the writ shall mail a copy of the writ to the defendant. The writ shall be sent by first class United States mail with the postage prepaid. The envelope shall be furnished and properly addressed by the plaintiff.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3; 1988, ch. 42, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “writ” for “papers,” and “envelope” for “envelopes.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-15-410.
Release or discharge of garnishment.

At any time, either before
or after the service of any writ of garnishment, the defendant may
obtain a release or discharge as provided by W.S.

1-15-105

. In the case of a writ of post judgment garnishment,
the condition of the bond required by W.S.

1-15-105

(a)(ii) shall be to the effect that if the plaintiff is entitled
to execute the writ upon the property seized, the defendant will pay
an amount equal to the value of the property, together with interest
and all costs assessed against him, not exceeding the sum specified
in the bond.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

§ 1-15-411.
Delivery of property.

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 42, § 2.

The garnishee may deliver to the officer serving the writ the property belonging to and the money due to the defendant as shown by the answer of the garnishee. The officer shall return the property, money and the writ to the court. The property shall then be dealt with as ordered by the court. After the property is delivered, the garnishee shall be relieved from further liability in the proceedings, unless his answer is successfully controverted as provided in this article.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, §§ 145, 146; Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 482, 530 to 534, 547, 548; R.S. 1887, §§ 2830, 2878 to 2882, 2895, 2896, 3561, 3562; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3950, 3997 to 4001, 4014, 4015, 4472, 4473; Laws 1901, ch. 95, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1910, §§ 4795, 4809, 4856 to 4860, 4873, 4874, 5335, 5336; C.S. 1920, §§ 6064, 6065, 6079, 6126 to 6130, 6143, 6144, 6607, 6608; Laws 1927, ch. 94, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1622, 89-3110, 89-3124, 89-3310 to 89-3314, 89-3327, 89-3328; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-4712, 3-4802, 3-5010 to 3-5014, 3-5027, 3-5028, 14-1422, 14-1423; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239, 1-252, 1-253, 1-421, 1-430, 1-431, 1-579, 1-580; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114,

1-15-301

,

1-15-302

,

1-17-410

,

1-17-501

, 1-17-502, 1-21-309, 1-21-310; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3; 1988, ch. 42, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to the answer of the garnishee, see §

1-15-407

.

Meaning of section when garnishee comes in and admits indebtedness.
—

This section means that, when a garnishee comes in and answers that he owes money to the defendant, the court by that very fact obtains jurisdiction over the garnishee and the money garnisheed. The return of the officer in such case becomes immaterial, since evidence of what was done is shown by the appearance and answer of the garnishee. L.C. Jones Trucking Co. v. Superior Oil Co., 68 Wyo. 384, 234 P.2d 802,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1951).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Garnishee's pleading, answering interrogatories or the like as affecting his right to assert court's lack of jurisdiction, 41 ALR2d 1093.

§ 1-15-412.
Reply to answer of garnishee; trial of issues; judgment.

If the garnishee answers,
the plaintiff or defendant may, within ten (10) days after the answer
of the garnishee is filed with the court, file and serve upon the
garnishee and the other party to the action a reply to the garnishee’s
answer. Either party may also allege any matters which would charge
the garnishee with liability. New matter in a reply is deemed denied.
Matters in issue shall be tried to the court and judgment entered
as in other civil actions. Costs shall be awarded to the prevailing
party unless the court otherwise directs.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534, 547, 551 to 553; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882, 2895, 2899 to 2901; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001, 4014, 4018 to 4020; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860, 4873, 4877 to 4879; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130, 6143, 6147 to 6149; Laws 1927, ch. 94, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314, 89-3327, 89-3331 to 89-3333; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014, 3-5027, 3-5031 to 3-5033; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239, 1-252, 1-256 to 1-258; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114, 1-14-301,

1-15-305

to 1-15-307; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to costs generally, see §§

1-14-101

to

1-14-127

.

Support garnishments have priority. —

Support garnishments have priority and where they result in the withholding of 25 percent or more of an employee's disposable earnings, creditor garnishment is impermissible. Union Pac. R.R. v. Trona Valley Fed. Credit Union, 2002 WY 165, 57 P.3d 1203,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

§ 1-15-413.
Judgment on answer of garnishee.

The parties to the principal action who fail to reply to the answer of the garnishee shall be deemed to have accepted it as correct. If both parties to the principal action have accepted the answer, an appropriate judgment shall be entered. If the answer shows that the garnishment has attached personal property of any kind in the possession or under the control of the garnishee which belongs to and is due the defendant, the court shall enter judgment that the garnishee deliver the personal property to the sheriff. If the plaintiff has already recovered, or subsequently recovers judgment against the defendant in the action, the personal property or as much as may be necessary shall be sold upon execution and the proceeds applied toward the satisfaction of the judgment, together with the costs of the action and proceedings. Any surplus of the personal property or the proceeds thereof shall be returned to the defendant.

If the answer shows that the garnishee is indebted to the defendant, and if the plaintiff has recovered, or subsequently recovers judgment against the defendant in the action, the court shall also enter judgment in favor of the defendant for the use of the plaintiff against the garnishee. The judgment shall be the amount attached as shown in the answer but shall not be for a greater sum than is necessary to satisfy the judgment against the defendant, together with costs. In no event shall the garnishee be chargeable with costs except under the provisions of W.S.

1-15-412

and

1-15-414

.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 148; Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534, 550 to 553; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882, 2898 to 2901, 3564; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001, 4017 to 4020, 4475; C.S. 1910, §§ 4855 to 4860, 4876 to 4879, 5339; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130, 6146 to 6149, 6611; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1625, 89-3310 to 89-3314, 89-3330 to 89-3333; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014, 3-5030 to 3-5033, 14-1425; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239, 1-255 to 1-258, 1-582; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114,

1-15-304

to 1-15-307, 1-21-312; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Meaning of section when garnishee comes in and admits indebtedness.
—

This section means that, when a garnishee comes in and answers that he owes money to the defendant, the court by that very fact obtains jurisdiction over the garnishee and the money garnisheed. The return of the officer in such case becomes immaterial, since evidence of what was done is shown by the appearance and answer of the garnishee. L.C. Jones Trucking Co. v. Superior Oil Co., 68 Wyo. 384, 234 P.2d 802,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1951).

Cited

in

Union Pac. R.R. v. Trona Valley Fed. Credit Union, 2002 WY 165, 57 P.3d 1203,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 1-15-414.
Proceedings on failure of garnishee to answer.

If the garnishee has
been duly served with a writ of prejudgment or post judgment garnishment
and fails to answer as required by W.S.

1-15-407

, the plaintiff may enter the default of the garnishee
and proceed to prove the liability of the garnishee. The garnishee
may be ordered to appear before the court or a master appointed by
the court and be examined in the same manner as persons are examined
under the discovery provisions of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.
The court may make provision for witness fees and mileage as is just,
provided that if any garnishee has willfully failed to file any required
answer, he may be required to pay the costs of any proceeding taken
for the purpose of obtaining the information required to be furnished
in the answer. Judgment shall be entered upon the evidence to the
same effect as if the garnishee had answered. Costs shall be awarded
to the prevailing party unless the court otherwise directs.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 132; Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 475, 530 to 534, 551 to 553; R.S. 1887, §§ 2823, 2878 to 2882, 2899 to 2901, 3548; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3943, 3997 to 4001, 4018 to 4020, 4459; C.S. 1910, §§ 4802, 4856 to 4860, 4877 to 4879, 5322; C.S. 1920, §§ 6072, 6126 to 6130, 6147 to 6149, 6594; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1608, 89-3117, 89-3310 to 89-3314, 89-3331 to 89-3333; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-4705, 3-5010 to 3-5014, 3-5031 to 3-5033, 14-1408; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239, 1-256 to 1-258, 1-414, 1-578; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114,

1-15-305

to 1-15-307,

1-17-405

, 1-21-308; Laws 1985, ch. 194, § 2; 1986, ch. 62, § 1; 1987, ch. 198, § 3; 1988, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to deposition and discovery, see Rules 26 through 37, W.R.C.P.

§ 1-15-415.
Judgment discharges garnishee for amount paid.

A garnishee shall be
discharged from all claims of all parties in the garnishee action
for all goods, effects and credits paid, delivered or accounted for
by the garnishee as a result of any judgment against the garnishee.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534, 551 to 553; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882, 2899 to 2901; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 2997 to 4001, 4018 to 4020; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860, 4877 to 4879; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130, 6147 to 6149; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314, 89-3331 to 89-3333; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014, 3-5031 to 3-5033; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239, 1-256 to 1-258; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114,

1-15-305

to 1-15-307; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Form of judgment against garnishee respecting obligation payable in installments, 7 ALR2d 680.

§ 1-15-416.
Intervention or interpleader of third persons.

If it appears that any person not a party to the action has or claims an interest in any of the garnished property antedating the garnishment, the court may permit that person to appear and maintain his rights.

If the answer of the garnishee discloses that any person other than the defendant claims the indebtedness or property in his hands, the court may on motion order that the claimant be interpleaded as a defendant to the garnishee action. Notice in such form as the court shall direct, together with a copy of the order, shall be served upon the third-party claimant in the manner required for the service of a summons. The garnishee may pay or deliver to the court the indebtedness or property, which shall be a complete discharge from all liability to any party for the amount paid or property delivered. The third-party claimant shall be deemed a defendant to the garnishee action and shall answer within ten (10) days, setting forth his claim or defense. In case of default, judgment may be rendered as in other cases of default which shall conclude any claim upon the part of the third-party claimant.

Any person who intervenes or is interpleaded as a defendant under this section is bound by the judgment in the garnishee action.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534, 551 to 553; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882, 2899 to 2901; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001, 4018 to 4020; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860, 4877 to 4879; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130, 6147 to 6149; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314, 89-3331 to 89-3333; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014, 3-5031 to 3-5033; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239, 1-256 to 1-258; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114,

1-15-305

to 1-15-307; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

§ 1-15-417.
Claims of garnishee against plaintiff or defendant.

A garnishee may retain
or deduct out of the property, effects or credits of the defendant
in his hands all demands whether or not due against the plaintiff
and against the defendant of which he could have availed himself if
he had not been served as garnishee. The garnishee is liable for the
balance only after all mutual demands between himself and the plaintiff
and defendant are settled, not including unliquidated damages for
wrongs and injuries. The verdict or findings, if any, and the judgment
shall show against which party any claim is allowed, and the amount
thereof.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Debtor’s Note Set-Off. —

Because a debtor's note was set-off against her obligation to a limited liability company (LLC) as allowed by
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-15-417

, the note was satisfied and a mortgage terminated at the time the LLC answered a creditor's writ of garnishment. As the debtor did not file her petition until after that date, the mortgage was not property of the estate, regardless of the fact that the LLC did not file a cancellation form or discharge as required under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

34-2-113

and

34-1-130

, and thus, the creditor did not violate the automatic stay by seeking to foreclose on the LLC's property.
In re Ford, 2013 Bankr. LEXIS 179 (Bankr. D. Wyo. Jan. 16, 2013).

§ 1-15-418.
Liability of garnishee on negotiable instruments.

No person shall be liable
as garnishee for having drawn, accepted, made or endorsed any negotiable
instrument in the hands of the defendant at the time of service of
the writ of prejudgment or post judgment garnishment when the negotiable
instrument is not due.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

§ 1-15-419.
When garnishee is mortgagee or pledgee.

When any personal property,
choses in action or effects of the defendant in the hands of the garnishee
are mortgaged or pledged, or in any way liable for the payment of
a debt to the garnishee, the plaintiff may obtain an order from the
court authorizing the plaintiff to pay the amount due the garnishee,
and requiring the garnishee to deliver the personal property, choses
in action and effects, to the officer serving the writ of prejudgment
or post judgment garnishment upon payment to the garnishee of the
amount due him by the plaintiff.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014; W.S. 1957; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

§ 1-15-420.
Where property held to secure performance of other obligation.

The court may order the plaintiff to redeem personal property, choses in action or effects levied upon under a writ of prejudgment or post judgment garnishment by performing the obligation or tendering performance if:

The personal property, choses in action or effects secure any obligation other than the payment of money; and

The obligation secured can be performed by the plaintiff without damage to the interested persons.

Upon performance under subsection (a) of this section or any tender thereof which is refused, the garnishee shall deliver the personal property and effects to the officer serving the writ.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

§ 1-15-421.
Disposition of property.

All personal property, choses in action and effects received by the sheriff under W.S.

1-15-419

or

1-15-420

, shall be disposed of in the same manner as if the property, choses in action and effects had been delivered by the garnishee under the provisions of W.S.

1-15-411

, provided that the plaintiff shall, out of the proceeds thereof:

Be first repaid the amount paid by him to the garnishee for the redemption of the property, choses in action or effects; or

Be indemnified for any other act or thing done by him or performed pursuant to the order of the court for the redemption of the property, choses in action or effects.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 1-15-422.
Effect of discharge of garnishee.

Except as provided by W.S.

1-15-415

, a judgment discharging a garnishee shall be no bar to
an action brought against the garnishee by the defendant for or on
account of the same demand.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001; C.S.1910, §§ 4856 to 4860; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 5014; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239; Laws 1977, ch. 188, 4N1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

§ 1-15-423.
Execution on judgment against garnishee for debt not due.

When a judgment is rendered
against a garnishee with respect to a debt from the garnishee to the
defendant and the debt is not yet due, execution shall not issue until
the debt has become due.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 530 to 534; R.S. 1887, §§ 2878 to 2882; Laws 1895, ch. 14, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3997 to 4001; C.S. 1910, §§ 4856 to 4860; C.S. 1920, §§ 6126 to 6130; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-3310 to 89-3314; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5010 to 3-5014; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-235 to 1-239; Laws 1977, ch. 188, 4N1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-110 to 1-15-114; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.